cs: Věková skupina psů: Dospělý; Junior; Štěně; Senior; Jiné
fr: Tranche d’âge du chien: Adulte; Junior; Chiots; Senior; Autre
sl-SI: Starostna skupina psov: Odrasla; Mladi; Kužek; Starejša; Drugo
ko: 개 연령대: 어덜트; 주니어; 강아지; 시니어; 기타
hu: Kutya életszakasza: Felnőtt; Junior; Kölyök; Idős; Egyéb
lt-LT: Šunų amžiaus grupė: Suaugusiems; Jaunikliams; Šuniukams; Senjorams; Kita
tr: Köpek Yaş Grubu: Yetişkin; Genç; Yavru; Yaşlı; Diğer
fi: Koiran ikäryhmä: Aikuinen; Juniori; Pentu; Seniori; Muu
ru: Возрастная группа собак: Взрослый; Ребенок; Щенок; Пожилой; Другой
vi: Nhóm tuổi chó: Trưởng thành; Nhỏ; Chó con; Phù hợp với người cao tuổi; Khác
pl: Grupa wiekowa psów: Dorosły; Młodszy prawnik; Szczeniak; wyższy; Inne
bg-BG: Възрастова група на кучета: Зряла възраст; Млада възраст; Кученце; Възрастни; Други
el: Ηλικιακή ομάδα σκύλου: Ενήλικη; Για μικρά παιδιά; Κουτάβι; Ηλικιωμένη; Άλλο
zh-TW: 犬年齡層: 成人; 大三生; 小狗; 高齡; 其他
hr-HR: Dobna skupina pasa: Odrasli psi; Mladi psi; Štenci; Stariji psi; Ostalo
sk-SK: Veková skupina psov: Dospelý; Junior; Šteniatko; Senior; Iné
nl: Leeftijdsgroep hond: Volwassen; Junior; Puppy; Senior; Andere
pt-BR: Faixa etária do cachorro: Adulto; Jovem; Filhote; Idoso; Outro
ja: 犬の年齢層: 成犬; ジュニア; 子犬; シニア; その他
sv: Åldersgrupp för hund: Vuxen; Junior; Valp; Senior; Övrigt
th: กลุ่มอายุสุนัข: ผู้ใหญ่; วัยรุ่น; ลูกหมา; สูงวัย; อื่นๆ
it: Fascia di età del cane: Adulto; Junior; Cucciolo; Senior; Altro
de: Hundealtersgruppe: Erwachsen; Jung; Welpe; Senior; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 犬只年龄段: 成年; 少年; 幼犬; 老年; 其他
da: Hundealdersgruppe: Adult; Junior; Hundehvalp; Senior; Andet
nb: Aldersgruppe for hunder: Voksen; Junior; Valp; Senior; Annet
pt-PT: Grupo etário dos cães: Adulto; Júnior; Cachorrinho; Sénior; Outro
ro-RO: Grup de vârstă câini: Adult; Junior; Cățel; Senior; Altele
es: Grupo de edad del perro: Adulto; Júnior; Cachorro; Sénior; Otros
en: Dog age group: Adult; Junior; Puppy; Senior; Other